Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201948-196
State agency; handle claims; Attorney General; supervision.

The Risk Manager may delegate to a state agency the handling of workers' compensation claims of employees of that agency, under the supervision and direction of the Attorney General.

Laws 1971, LB 390, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 125;

Laws 2000, LB 1221, § 16;

Laws 2019, LB418, § 5.